Washington statutes.
RCW 43.166.060

State lands development authority capital account.

The state lands development authority capital account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for capital projects under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 259 s 6.]